API/spylls/examples/si_LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 233 Y 321 
SFX 233 0 ගත් .
SFX 233 0 ගත්ත .
SFX 233 0 ගෙන .
SFX 233 0 ගත්හ .
SFX 233 0 ගන්නවා .
SFX 233 0 ගන්නෙමි .
SFX 233 0 ගන්නෙමු .
SFX 233 0 ගන්නෙහි .
SFX 233 0 ගන්නෙහු .
SFX 233 0 ගන්නේය .
SFX 233 0 ගන්නීය .
SFX 233 0 ගන්නාය .
SFX 233 0 ගන්නෝය .
SFX 233 0 ගන්න .
SFX 233 0 ගනු .
SFX 233 0 ගනිමි .
SFX 233 0 ගනිමි .
SFX 233 0 ගනිමු .
SFX 233 0 ගනිහි .
SFX 233 0 ගනිහු .
SFX 233 0 ගනිහ .
SFX 233 0 ගනියි .
SFX 233 0 ගනිති .
SFX 233 0 ගත්තා  .
SFX 233 0 ගත්තෙමි  .
SFX 233 0 ගත්තෙමු  . 
SFX 233 0 ගත්තෙහි  .
SFX 233 0 ගත්තෙහු  . 
SFX 233 0 ගත්තේය  .
SFX 233 0 ගත්තාය  .
SFX 233 0 ගත්තහ  .
SFX 233 0 ගත්තෝය  .
SFX 233 0 ගත්තාලු  .
SFX 233 0 ගත්තේලු  .
SFX 233 0 ගත්තහලු  .
SFX 233 0 ගත්තෝලු  .
SFX 233 0 ගත්තාවේ  .
SFX 233 0 ගත්තදෙන්  .
SFX 233 0 ගත්තාදෙන්  .
SFX 233 0 ගත්තපුදෙන්  . 
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙනවා .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙමි .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙන්නෙමි .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙමු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙන්නෙමු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙහි .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙන්නෙහි .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙහු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙන්නෙහු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙන්නේය .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙන්නීය .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙන්නාය .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙති .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙන්නෝය .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙන්න .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙව .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙනු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙපිය .
SFX 233 0 ගැනොපිය .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙපන් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනොපන් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙව් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙපියව් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනොපියව් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙපල්ලා .
SFX 233 0 ගැනොපල්ලා .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙනවාලා .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙයිලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙන්නේලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙතිලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙන්නෝලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙද්දෙන් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙපුවාවේ .
SFX 233 0 ගැනොපුවාවේ .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙපුදෙන් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනොපුදෙන් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනොවි .
SFX 233 0 ගැනේවි .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වනවා .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වමි .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වන්නෙමි .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වමු .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වන්නෙමු .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වහි .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වන්නෙහි .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වහු .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වන්නෙහු .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වන්නේය .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වන්නීය .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වන්නාය .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වති .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වන්නෝය .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වන්න .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වව .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වනු .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වපිය .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වාපිය .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වපන් .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වාපන් .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වව් .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වපියව් .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වාපියව් .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වපල්ලා .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වාපල්ලා .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වනවාලා .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වයිලු .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වන්නේලු .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වතිලු .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වන්නෝලු .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වද්දෙන් .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වපුවාවේ .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වාපුවාවේ .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වපුදෙන් .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වාපුදෙන් .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වාවි .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වේවි .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙනවා .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙමි .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙන්නෙමි .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙමු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙන්නෙමු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙහි .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙන්නෙහි .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙහු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙන්නෙහු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙන්නේය .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙන්නීය .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙන්නාය .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙති .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙන්නෝය .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙන්න .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙව .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙනු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙපිය .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වොපිය .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙපන් .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වොපන් .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙව් .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙපියව් .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වොපියව් .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙපල්ලා .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වොපල්ලා .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙනවාලා .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙයිලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙන්නේලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙතිලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙන්නෝලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙද්දෙන් .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙපුවාවේ .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වොපුවාවේ .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වෙපුදෙන් .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වොපුදෙන් .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වොවි .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වේවි .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුණා .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුණෙමි .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුණෙමු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුණෙහි .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුණෙහු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුණේය .
SFX 233 0 ගැනිණ .
SFX 233 0 ගැනිණි .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුණි .
SFX 233 0 ගැනීය . 
SFX 233 0 ගැනුණාය .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුණෝය .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුණහ .
SFX 233 0 ගැනියහ .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුණාලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුණේලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුණහලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුණෝලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුණාවේ .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුණදෙන් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුනා .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුනෙමි .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුනෙමු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුනෙහි .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුනෙහු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුනේය .
SFX 233 0 ගැනින .
SFX 233 0 ගැනිනි .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුනි .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුනාය .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුනහ .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුනෝය .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුනාලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුනේලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුනහලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුනෝලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුනාවේ .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුනදෙන් .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුණා .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුණෙමි .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුණෙමු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුණෙහි .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුණෙහු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුණේය .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්විණ .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්විණි .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුණි .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වීය . 
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුණාය .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුණෝය .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුණහ .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වියහ .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුණාලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුණේලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුණහලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුණෝලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුණාවේ .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුණදෙන් .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුනා .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුනෙමි .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුනෙමු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුනෙහි .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුනෙහු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුනේය .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වින .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්විනි .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුනි .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුනාය .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුනහ .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුනෝය .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුනාලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුනේලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුනහලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුනෝලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුනාවේ .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්වුනදෙන් .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්නුවා .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්නුවෙමි .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්නුවෙමු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්නුවෙහි .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්නුවෙහු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්නුවේය .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්නුවාය .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්නුහ .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්නුවහ .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්නුවෝය .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්නුවාලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්නුවේලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්නුහලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්නුවහලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්නුවෝලු .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්නුවාවේ .
SFX 233 0 ගැන්නුවදෙන් .
SFX 233 0 ගන්න .
SFX 233 0 ගන්නා .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වන .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වනා .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වපු .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වා .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වලා .
SFX 233 0 ගන්මගනින් .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වමගනින් .
SFX 233 0 ගනිත්ම .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වත්ම .
SFX 233 0 ගන්නන .
SFX 233 0 ගනින්නට .
SFX 233 0 ගනින්ට .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වන්න .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වන්නට .
SFX 233 0 ගනිද්දී .
SFX 233 0 ගනිත්දී .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වද්දී .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වත්දී .
SFX 233 0 ගන්තොත් .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වතොත් .
SFX 233 0 ගන්තත් .
SFX 233 0 ගන්වතත් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙන .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙනා .
SFX 233 0 ගැනවෙන .
SFX 233 0 ගැනවෙනා .
SFX 233 0 ගැනූ .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුණ .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුණු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනිච්ච .
SFX 233 0 ගැනවූ .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙව්ව .
SFX 233 0 ගැනවුණු .
SFX 233 0 ගැනවෙව්ව .
SFX 233 0 ගැනී .
SFX 233 0 ගැනිලා .
SFX 233 0 ගැනවී .
SFX 233 0 ගැනවිලා .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙමින් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනවෙමින් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙත්ම .
SFX 233 0 ගැනවෙත්ම .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙන්න .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙන්ට .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙන්නට .
SFX 233 0 ගැනීමට .	
SFX 233 0 ගැනවෙන්න  .
SFX 233 0 ගැනවෙන්ට  .
SFX 233 0 ගැනවෙන්නට  .
SFX 233 0 ගැනවීමට .	
SFX 233 0 ගැනිය .
SFX 233 0 ගැනවිය .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙද්දී .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙත්දී .
SFX 233 0 ගැනවෙද්දී .
SFX 233 0 ගැනවෙත්දී .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුවොත් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුවොතින් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙතොත් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුණොත් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුණොතින් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙව්වොත් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙව්වොතින් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනවෙතොත් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනවුණොත් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනවුණොතින් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුවත් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙතත් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනුණත් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනෙව්වත් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනවෙතත් .
SFX 233 0 ගැනවුණත් .
