API/spylls/examples/si_LK.dic
අර/233
අහ/233
ඇද/233
කොර/233
ගමන්/233
ගිනි/233
ගොඩනගා/233
ජය/233
ඩැහැ/233
තියා/233,240
දැන/233,240
දිනා/233,240
දීා/233,240
නමා/233,240
පටන්/233
පලි/233
පාවා/233
පැන/233
පිළි/233
බලා/233,240
බේර/233,240
බේරා/233,240
භාර/233
මැඩ/233,240
රඳව/233,240
රැක/233,240
ලබා/233,240
වගබලා/233
වඩා/233
වැද්ද/233,240
විඳ/233,240
විළිවසා/233
සිඳ/233
සිප/233
සොයා/233,240
සොරා/233
හට/233
හඳුනා/233,240
හිමිකර/233
කර/233,240
